Utah statutes.
78B-6-1002.   Right of action for injuries to trees -- Damage.
Any person who without authority cuts down or carries off any wood or
underwood, tree or timber, or girdles or otherwise injures any tree or timber
on the land of another person, or on the street or highway in front of any
person's house, town or city lot, or cultivated grounds, or on the commons or
public grounds of any city or town, or on the street or highway in front,
without lawful authority, is liable to the owner of such land, or to the city
or town, for treble the amount of damages which may be assessed in a civil
action.
